Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.800

Associate license renewals—Report.

To assess whether limitations on associate license renewals may be limiting the number of people able to complete the licensing process within statutory deadlines, the secretary shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on October 1st of each year, beginning in 2014 and ending in 2020, the number of associate licenses that have been renewed four, five, or six times.

[ 2013 c 73 s 5.]